Georgia, session 2025_26, HB695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Georgia Student Finance Authority, is amended by adding a new subpart to
read as follows:
"Subpart 2B
20-3-367.
As used in this subpart, the term:
H. B. 695
- 1 -

LC 61 0155
(1) 'Commission' means the Georgia Student Finance Commission created by Code
Section 20-3-233.
(2) 'Eligible student' means a person:
(A) Whose family income is considered economically disadvantaged, based on criteria
established by the commission;
(B) Who meets any academic or other standards established by the commission;
(C) Who is eligible for a scholarship or grant pursuant to Code Section 20-3-519.1;
(D) Who has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA);
(E) Who is enrolled in a qualified institution; and
(F) Who has applied and is eligible for state or federal financial aid but has not
received his or her financial aid award within two weeks of the first day of the semester
or quarter.
(3) 'Essential materials' means books, materials, or other items identified by the course
instructor as essential to participating in and completing a required course as part of an
eligible student's program of study.
(4) 'Qualified institution' shall have the same meaning as the term 'eligible postsecondary
institution' as set forth in Code Section 20-3-519.
20-3-368.
(a) Subject to appropriations, the commission shall establish a needs based financial aid
program to provide grants to eligible students for the purpose of obtaining essential
materials. The maximum award amount per eligible student shall be $5,000.00 in total.
Grant awards shall be disbursed directly to each student who is awarded a grant under this
subpart. The commission may provide for individualized eligibility criteria and grant
amounts as determined to be the most appropriate for the particular qualified institution and
program of study in accordance with this subpart and the rules and regulations of the
commission.
H. B. 695
- 2 -

LC 61 0155
(b) Each eligible student wishing to receive a grant pursuant to this subpart shall submit
a grant application in accordance with the rules, regulations, and procedures prescribed by
the commission. Such application shall include the essential materials such student wishes
to obtain and the estimated cost of such essential materials.
20-3-369.
The commission is authorized to define such terms and prescribe such rules, regulations,
and procedures as may be reasonable and necessary to carry out the purposes of this
subpart. Such rules, regulations, and procedures shall provide for the expedited processing
of applications and disbursement of grant awards."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 695
- 3 -